Hawaii, session 2026, SB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 612-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Each juror or prospective juror shall be paid [$30] $50 for each day of actual attendance at court. In addition, each juror or prospective juror shall be paid the higher of either: (1)  33 cents for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going to and from court; or (2)  The cost of an adult bus fare to and from the court. A person who appears at the time for which that person is summoned to court for jury duty may be allowed the mileage fee or bus fare although the person, upon that person's request, is subsequently excused or exempted from jury service." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $684,385 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request